New York, session 2025-2026, S9927.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subsection (a) of section 343 of the insurance law, as 2 added by chapter 207 of the laws of 2019, is amended to read as follows: 3 (a) (i) Beginning July first, two thousand nineteen and every two 4 years thereafter, each insurer providing managed care products, individ- 5 ual comprehensive accident and health insurance or group or blanket 6 comprehensive accident and health insurance, each corporation organized 7 pursuant to article forty-three of this chapter providing comprehensive 8 health insurance and each entity licensed pursuant to article forty-four 9 of the public health law providing comprehensive health service plans 10 shall submit to the superintendent, in a form and manner prescribed by 11 the superintendent, a report detailing the entity's compliance with 12 federal and state mental health and substance use disorder parity laws 13 based on the entity's record during the preceding two calendar years. 14 The superintendent shall publish on the department's website on or 15 before October first, two thousand nineteen, and every two years there- 16 after, the reports submitted pursuant to this section. The superinten- 17 dent shall also publish on the department's website a summary of these 18 reports to assist stakeholders and the general public in reviewing, 19 understanding and evaluating any data compiled as part of the audit 20 process including but not limited to a summary of the data as required 21 by paragraph one of subsection (b) of this section, comparison of the 22 data provided by each insurer providing managed care products, individ- 23 ual comprehensive accident and health insurance or group or blanket 24 comprehensive accident and health insurance, each corporation organized 25 pursuant to article forty-three of this chapter providing comprehensive 26 health insurance and each entity licensed pursuant to article forty-four EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD09643-03-6 S. 9927 2 1 of the public health law providing comprehensive health service plans 2 for each, overall ranking for each insurer, major findings, any correc- 3 tive actions required to be taken, any fines or penalties levied as a 4 result, and recommendations to enhance compliance with federal and state 5 mental health and substance use disorder parity laws. The department 6 shall provide a copy of the report to the governor, the temporary presi- 7 dent of the senate, the speaker of the assembly, and members of the 8 legislature. 9 (ii) The superintendent shall audit each report submitted pursuant to 10 this section. Such audit shall include, but not be limited to, an exam- 11 ination of each such report submitted by the insurer for the purpose of 12 determining if such insurer is in full compliance with federal and state 13 mental health and substance use disorder parity requirements. In addi- 14 tion, the superintendent shall investigate all credible allegations of 15 insurer improprieties and noncompliance. Where the superintendent makes 16 a determination that an insurer has willfully violated federal or state 17 mental health and substance use disorder parity requirements, the super- 18 intendent shall provide such findings, including the reason or reasons 19 for making such determination, to the office of the attorney general. 20 The attorney general shall consider the superintendent's findings and, 21 upon agreement with the superintendent's determination, shall commence 22 an action in the name of the people of the state to enforce an insurer's 23 required compliance with federal and state mental health and substance 24 use disorder parity requirements. 25 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately.